Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4676.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 602. (1) Guardianship for individuals an individual with
a developmental disability shall must be utilized only as is
necessary to promote and protect the well-being of the individual,
including protection from neglect, exploitation, and abuse; shall
must take into account the individual's abilities; shall must be
designed to encourage the development of maximum self-reliance and
independence in the individual; and shall must be ordered only to
the extent necessitated by the individual's actual mental and
adaptive limitations.
WAM H00270'25 (H-1) 721zo0


(2) If the court finds that an individual has a developmental
disability and that the individual is likely to need protection
based on the factors set forth in section 618(1), the court shall
apply the least restrictive alternative principle as described in
this chapter. The court shall not restrict the individual's
personal liberty or the individual's freedom to manage the
individual's financial resources to a greater extent than is
necessary to protect the individual's person and the individual's
estate. The limitations imposed on the guardian's authority as set
forth in the court's findings must be stated in the letters of
guardianship and in the notice of first publication of letters of
guardianship granted.
(3) Before appointing a guardian for an individual with a
developmental disability, the court shall consider whether the
individual's needs may be met without appointing a guardian by a
less restrictive alternative, including, but not limited to, the
following:
(a) The use of an attorney-in-fact if there is evidence that
the individual appointed an attorney-in-fact in a durable power of
attorney executed by the individual before the petition was filed.
(b) The management of the beneficial interests of the
individual in a trust by a trustee.
(c) The use of a representative payee if there is evidence
that a representative payee was appointed to manage the
individual's public benefits.
(d) Supported decision making or the provision of protective
or supportive services or arrangements by individuals or public or
private services or agencies. As used in this subdivision,
"supported decision making" means a process through which an
WAM H00270'25 (H-1) 721zo0


individual with a developmental disability works with friends,
family members, and professionals who help the individual
understand the situation and choices the individual faces so the
individual may make the individual's own decisions.
(e) The use of appropriate services or assistive technology.
(f) The appointment of a temporary guardian under section 607
or guardian of the estate under this chapter.
(g) The appointment of a partial guardian under this chapter.
(4) (2) If the court determines that some form of guardianship
is necessary, partial guardianship is the preferred form of
guardianship for an individual with a developmental disability.
Final Page
WAM H00270'25 (H-1) 721zo0